Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 7. EARLY VOTING

SUBTITLE A. EARLY VOTING

CHAPTER 83. OFFICER CONDUCTING EARLY VOTING

SUBCHAPTER A. EARLY VOTING CLERK

Sec. 83.001. EARLY VOTING CLERK GENERALLY. (a) The early voting clerk shall conduct the early voting in each election.

(b) The clerk is an officer of the election in which the clerk serves.

(c) The clerk has the same duties and authority with respect to early voting as a presiding election judge has with respect to regular voting, except as otherwise provided by this title.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 83.002. COUNTY CLERK AS EARLY VOTING CLERK. The county clerk is the early voting clerk for the county in:

(1) the general election for state and county officers and any other countywide election held at county expense;

(2) a primary election; and

(3) a special election ordered by the governor.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 83.003. CLERK FOR LESS-THAN-COUNTYWIDE ELECTIONS HELD AT COUNTY EXPENSE. (a) In a less-than-countywide election ordered by the commissioners court, county judge, county board of school trustees, or any other county authority and held at county expense, the county clerk is the early voting clerk unless the authority appoints a person other than the county clerk.

(b) To be eligible for appointment as early voting clerk under this section, a person must meet the requirements for eligibility for service as a presiding election judge, except that the appointee must be a qualified voter of the county and is not required to be a qualified voter of any other particular territory.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 83.004. CLERK FOR ELECTIONS ORDERED BY COUNTY AUTHORITY NOT HELD AT COUNTY EXPENSE. (a) In an election ordered by the commissioners court, county judge, county board of school trustees, or any other county authority and not held at county expense, the authority ordering the election shall appoint the early voting clerk.

(b) If the county clerk is appointed as early voting clerk under this section, the county clerk shall serve in that capacity, and the authority responsible for paying the expenses of the election shall reimburse the county for the time spent by the county clerk as the early voting clerk and by the county clerk's deputies as deputy early voting clerks.

(c) To be eligible for appointment as early voting clerk under this section, a person other than the county clerk must meet the requirements for eligibility for service as a presiding election judge, except that the appointee must be a qualified voter of the county and is not required to be a qualified voter of any other particular territory.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 83.005. CLERK FOR CITY ELECTIONS. The city secretary is the early voting clerk for an election ordered by an authority of a city.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 83.006. CLERK FOR ELECTIONS OF OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. (a) In an election ordered by an authority of a political subdivision other than a county or city, the authority ordering the election shall appoint the early voting clerk.

(b) To be eligible for appointment as early voting clerk under this section, a person must meet the requirements for eligibility for service as a presiding election judge, except that:

(1) an appointee must be a qualified voter of the political subdivision and is not required to be a qualified voter of any other particular territory;

(2) in an election in which an officer of the political subdivision is a candidate, an appointee's status as an employee of the political subdivision does not make the appointee ineligible for appointment as the clerk; and

(3) an appointee who is a permanent employee of the political subdivision and a qualified voter of any territory is not required to be a qualified voter of the political subdivision.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 83.007. CLERK FOR OTHER ELECTIONS. (a) In an election for which this code does not provide for an early voting clerk, the authority ordering the election shall appoint the early voting clerk.

(b) To be eligible for appointment as early voting clerk under this section, a person must meet the requirements for eligibility for service as a presiding election judge, except that:

(1) an appointee must be a qualified voter of the territory covered by the election and is not required to be a qualified voter of any other particular territory; and

(2) an appointee who is a permanent employee of the authority ordering the election and a qualified voter of any territory is not required to be a qualified voter of the territory covered by the election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 83.008. ADDITIONAL CLERKS FOR CERTAIN ELECTIONS. (a) In an election on the creation, organization, functioning, or existence of one or more political subdivisions that affects more than one political subdivision, more than one early voting clerk may be appointed.

(b) An area within the territory covered by the election may not be served by more than one clerk.

(c) Each clerk shall serve the one or more political subdivisions designated by the authority appointing the clerk.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 83.009. EMPLOYEE OF POLITICAL SUBDIVISION SERVING AS CLERK. An employee of a political subdivision may serve as early voting clerk in an election affecting the political subdivision if the political subdivision's governing body approves the appointment.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 83.010. PUBLIC NOTICE OF CLERK'S MAILING ADDRESS. An election order and the election notice must state the early voting clerk's official mailing address or street address at which the clerk may receive delivery by common or contract carrier, if different, phone number, e-mail address, and Internet website, if the early voting clerk has an Internet website.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 46, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 83.011. OFFICE HOURS ON ELECTION DAY. The early voting clerk's office shall remain open for early voting activities during the hours the polls are required to be open for voting on election day.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 83.012. STUDENT EARLY VOTING CLERKS. (a) The early voting clerk may appoint student early voting clerks as necessary to assist the early voting clerk.

(b) A person is eligible to serve as a student early voting clerk under this section if the person is ineligible to serve as a clerk of an election precinct under Section 32.051(c) but meets the eligibility requirements to be a student election clerk under Section 32.0511.

(c) A student early voting clerk serving under this section:

(1) is entitled to compensation under Section 83.052 in the same manner as other early voting clerks; and

(2) when communicating with a voter who cannot communicate in English, may communicate with the voter in a language the voter and the clerk understand as authorized by Subchapter B, Chapter 61.

(d) Not more than four student early voting clerks may serve at an early voting polling place.

(e) The secretary of state may initiate or assist in the development of a statewide program promoting the use of student early voting clerks appointed under this section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 542 (S.B. 553), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER B. DEPUTY CLERK

Sec. 83.031. DEPUTY EARLY VOTING CLERK GENERALLY. (a) Deputy early voting clerks may be appointed as provided by this subchapter to assist the early voting clerk.

(b) A deputy is an officer of the election in which the deputy serves.

(c) A deputy early voting clerk has the same authority as the early voting clerk in conducting early voting, subject to the early voting clerk's supervision.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 83.032. DEPUTY FOR COUNTY CLERK OR CITY SECRETARY. (a) In an election in which a county clerk or a city secretary is the early voting clerk, the county clerk or city secretary by written order may appoint one or more of that officer's permanent deputies as deputy early voting clerks. The clerk or secretary may appoint temporary deputies to serve as deputy early voting clerks in accordance with the law applicable to the appointment of deputies generally.

(b) For a temporary deputy to be eligible for appointment as a deputy early voting clerk under this section, the temporary deputy must meet the requirements for eligibility for service as a presiding election judge, except that:

(1) an appointee is not required to be a qualified voter of any particular territory other than the county, in the case of an appointment by a county clerk, or the city, in the case of an appointment by a city secretary;

(2) in an election in which the early voting clerk is a candidate, an appointee's status as an employee of the clerk does not make the appointee ineligible for appointment as a deputy early voting clerk; and

(3) an appointee who is a permanent employee of the county or city, as applicable, and a qualified voter of any territory is not required to be a qualified voter of the county or city, as applicable.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 83.033. DEPUTY FOR OTHER CLERKS. (a) In an election in which a person other than a county clerk or a city secretary is the early voting clerk, the authority appointing the clerk, by written order, may appoint one or more deputy early voting clerks.

(b) To be eligible for appointment as a deputy early voting clerk under this section, a person must meet the requirements for eligibility for appointment as the early voting clerk.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 83.034. EMPLOYEE OF POLITICAL SUBDIVISION SERVING AS DEPUTY. An employee of a political subdivision may serve as deputy early voting clerk in an election affecting the political subdivision if the political subdivision's governing body approves the appointment.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER C. COMPENSATION

Sec. 83.051. COMPENSATION OF COUNTY CLERK OR CITY SECRETARY. A county clerk or a city secretary is not entitled to receive additional compensation for serving as early voting clerk.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 83.052. COMPENSATION OF OTHER CLERKS AND THEIR DEPUTIES. An early voting clerk who is not a county clerk or city secretary and the deputy early voting clerks appointed to assist the clerk are entitled to compensation in an amount fixed by the authority ordering the election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 83.053. SERVICE WITHOUT COMPENSATION BY PUBLIC EMPLOYEE. (a) An employee of the authority ordering an election who is appointed as early voting clerk or deputy early voting clerk may be appointed to serve without additional compensation.

(b) An employee of a political subdivision who is appointed as early voting clerk or deputy early voting clerk for an election affecting the political subdivision may be appointed to serve without additional compensation if the political subdivision's governing body approves appointment on that basis.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.06; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.